g2p.foma
define GeneralPrefix {bez} | {do} | [d uo] | [m i m o] | {na} | {nad} | [n aa] | [nj e] | [nj e n a] | o | {od} | {odo} | {po} | [vdp o] | {pol} | [vdp o l] | {pre} | [vdp r e] | {pred} | [vdp r e d] | {pri} | [vdp r i] | {roz} | s | {so} | [sh] | {tri} | [vdt r i] | u | {uza} | v | {vy} | {vyna} | {za} | [z aa] ; 
define sPrefix {popri} | [vdp o vdp r i] | {pre} | [vdp r e] | {pri} | [vdp r i] | {za} | [z aa] ;
define AdjectiveSuffix {na} | [n aa] | {ne} | [nj e] | {ny} | [n yy] | {ni} | [nj i] | [n ii] | [nj ii] | {neho} | [nj e h o] | [y hh] | {nemu} | [nj e m u] | [n ee m u] | {nym} | {no} | {nom} | [n yy m] | {nimi} | [nj i m i] | [n ii m i] | [nj ii m i] | {nej} | [nj e j] | [n ee] | [n ee h o] | {mi} | [nj ii k] | [nj ii vdk] | [n uu tj] | [n y hh] | [n yy hh] | [yy mi] | [nj o v] | [n o s tj] | [n o s tj i] | [n o s tj ii] | [n o s tj i a m] | [n o s tj i a hh] | [n o s tj ou] | [n o s tj a m i] | [n uu] ;
define VSuffix [o v a tj] | [a tj] | [aa tj] | {ujem} | {ujeme} | [u j e sh] | [u j e tj e] | {oval} | {ovala} | {ovalo} | {ujeme} | [u j e tj e] | [u j uu] | {ame} | {am} | [a sh] | [a tj e] | a | {ame} | [a tj e] | [a j uu] | {aj} | [o r i tj] | {orka} | {il} | [i lj i] | {ila} | {ilo} | {ina} | {inka} | {iny} | {inky} | [ii n] | [i nj i e k] | [i nj e] | {inke} | [i n aa m] | [i n k aa m] | {inu} | {inku} | {iny} | {inky} | [i nj e] | {inke} | [i n aa hh] | [i n k aa hh] | {inou} | {inkou} | {inami} | {inkami} | {ice} | {iciam} | [i c i a hh] | {icami} | [ii c] | [nj ii k y] | [nj ii k a] | [nj ii k o v] | [v nj ii k u] | [nj ii k o m] | [nj ii k o hh] | [nj ii k a m i] | [nj ii k m i] | [nj ii k] | [nj ii vdk] | {la} | {ala} | [nj a] | {ov} | [a n yy] | [a n aa] | [a n ee] | [a n ii] | [a n ee h o] | {anej} | [a nj e j] | [a n ee m u] | [a n yy m] | [a n uu] | [a n yy hh] | {anom} | [a n yy hh] | [a n yy m i] | [nj u j e m] | [nj u j e sh] | [nj u j e] | [nj u j e m e] | [nj u j e tj e] | [nj u j uu] | {ner} | {neri} | {nera} | {nerov} | {nerovi} | {nerom} | {nera} | [n e r o hh] | {nerami} {nermi} | {na} | [nj i k] | [nj i c i] | [nj i k a] | [nj i k o v] | [nj i k o v i] | [nj i k o m] | [nj i k o v i] | [nj i k o hh] | [nj i k m i] | [nj i k a m i] | {nu} | [n yy m i] | [nj i vdc i] | [i vdc k aa] | [nj i vdc k yy] ; 
define vExceptions [o d nj] | [o t nj] | [o vdt nj] | [n o s vdt] | [n o s tj] | {nan} | [n a nj] | {nal} | [nj e nj] | [nj e n] | [nj i c] | [sh e t k] | [n aa v a] ; 
define tpExceptions [r VowelPhonem] | [l VowelPhonem] | [n VowelPhonem] | [nj VowelPhonem] | r .#. | l .#. | n .#. | [nj] .#. | {ner} | [r ConsonantPhonem] | [l ConsonantPhonem] | {vom} | [v ii m] | [v aa r] | [m VowelPhonem] | [v VowelPhonem .#.] ; 
define sSuffix [lj ii m] | [lj ii m e] | [lj ii sh] | [lj ii tj e] | [lj ii] | [lj i a] | [nj ii k] | {ujem} | {ujeme} | [u j e sh] | {ujete} | {uje} | [u j uu] | [l VowelPhonem] | [lj VowelPhonem] | {mi} | {vetl} | [v e t lj] | {voj} ; 
define hhExceptions {man} | [m a nj i] | {mana} | {manov} | {manovi} | [m a n o hh] | {manom} | {manmi} | {manami} | [nj a] | [nj e] | [nj ii] | [nj i a m] | [nj u] | [nj e] | [nj i a hh] | [nj a m i] | {no} | {ni} | [n uu] | {ron} ; 
define cExceptions [nj i n] ; 
define tjExceptions [m i .#.] ; 

define vInGroup [v] @-> [vlv] || ConsonantPhonem _ ConsonantPhonem ConsonantPhonem ,, [v] @-> [vlv] || ConsonantPhonem ConsonantPhonem _ ConsonantPhonem ,, [v] @-> [vlv] || \j & ConsonantPhonem ConsonantPhonem ConsonantPhonem _ ,, [v] @-> [vlv] || VowelPhonem _ [l | lj] ,, [v] @-> [vlv] || ConsonantPhonem _ [rr | ll] ,, [t] @-> [vdt] || ConsonantPhonem _ ConsonantPhonem ConsonantPhonem ,, [t] @-> [vdt] || ConsonantPhonem ConsonantPhonem _ ConsonantPhonem ,, [t] @-> [vdt] || ConsonantPhonem ConsonantPhonem ConsonantPhonem _ ,, v @-> [vlv] || o _ [n a k] ,, v @-> [vlv] || [dj e] _ [e t] ,, v @-> [vlv] || _ [dj] ; 
define voicingExceptions k @-> [vdk] || _ AdjectiveSuffix .#. | tpExceptions ,, k @-> [vdk] || \.#. _ [r vlv] ,, t @-> [vdt] || .#. | .#. VowelPhonem | .#. GeneralPrefix | .#. GeneralPrefix VowelPhonem _ VoicedConsonantPhonem \.#. ,, t @-> [vdt] || _ tpExceptions | AdjectiveSuffix .#. | {vr} | {vl} ,, p @-> [vdp] || _ tpExceptions | AdjectiveSuffix .#. ,, p @-> [vdp] || .#. | .#. VowelPhonem | .#. GeneralPrefix | .#. GeneralPrefix VowelPhonem _ VoicedConsonantPhonem \.#. ,, sh @-> [vdsh] || _ AdjectiveSuffix | sSuffix .#. ,, ts @-> [vdts] || _ [r vdt] | [r t] | AdjectiveSuffix | sSuffix .#. | [n a t VowelPhonem] | l | r ,, ts @-> [vdts] || [uu] | [i e] _ n ,, ts @-> [vdts] || a | [k r] _ m ,, c @-> [vdc] || _ AdjectiveSuffix .#. ,, t @-> [vdt] || {pe} _ r ,, f @-> [vdf] || _ tpExceptions | AdjectiveSuffix .#. ,, c @-> [vdc] || cExceptions ,, [k v] @-> [vdk vlv] || _ .#. | VowelPhonem ,, k @-> [vdk] || _ [r ConsonantPhonem] | [l ConsonantPhonem] | [r vdt] | [l vdt] | [r vdp] | [l vdp] ,, tj @-> [vdtj] || _ tjExceptions ,, [s m] @-> [vlz m] || .#. | .#. {ko} | .#. {no} | .#. {pro} _ e .#. ,, [ks] @-> [vdk vds] || [s e] _ {is} ; 
# [hh] @-> [vdhh] || .#. | .#. VowelPhonem | .#. GeneralPrefix | .#. GeneralPrefix VowelPhonem _ VoicedConsonantPhonem \.#. ,, [hh] @-> [vdhh] || _ l ,, [hh] @-> [vdhh] || {te} _ ,, [hh] @-> [vdhh] || _ hhExceptions ,, 
define blockVoicing [s n] @-> [vds n] || _ ,, [s nj] @-> [vds nj] || _ ,, [sh l] @-> [vdsh l] || _ ,, [sh lj] @-> [vdsh lj] || _ ,, [s l] @-> [vds l] || _ ,, [s lj] @-> [vds lj] || _ ,, [sh r] @-> [vdsh r] || _ ,, [s r] @-> [vds r] || _ ,, [s v] @-> [vds vlv] || _ ,, [sh v] @-> [vdsh vlv] || _ ,, [t v] @-> [vdt vlv] || _ ,, [t vlv] @-> [vdt vlv] || _ ,, [s m] @-> [vds m] || _ ,, [sh m] @-> [vdsh m] || _ ,, [sh n] @-> [vdsh n] || _ ,, [sh nj] @-> [vdsh nj] || _ , [ts nj] @-> [vdts nj] || _ , [v nj] @-> [vlv nj] || _ ; 
define voicing p @-> [vlb] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, tj @-> [vldj] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, t @-> [vld] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, c @-> [vldz] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, ts @-> [vldzh] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, k @-> [vlg] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, sh @-> [vlzh] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, s @-> [vlz] || \.#. \LongVowelPhonem _ VoicedConsonantPhonem \LongVowelPhonem ,, s @-> [vlz] || .#. _ {me} .#. ,, f @-> [vlv] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, [ks] @-> [vlg vlz] || e _ {is} | {eku} | [e k uu] ,, p @-> pvlb || \.#. _ .#. ,, t @-> pvld || \.#. _ .#. ,, tj @-> pvldj || \.#. _ .#. ,, c @-> pvldz || \.#. _ .#. ,, ts @-> pvldzh || \.#. _ .#. ,, k @-> pvlg || \.#. _ .#. ,, hh @-> pvlh || \.#. _ .#. ,, s @-> pvlz || \.#. _ .#. ,, sh @-> pvlzh || \.#. _ .#. ,, f @-> pvlv || \.#. _ .#. ,, s @-> [vlz] || {re} _ [i e b] ; 
# voicing hh to h is not very practical to do in the middle of a word, but at least leave it commented out here
# hh @-> [vlh] || \.#. _ VoicedConsonantPhonem ,, 
define devoicingExceptions v @-> [vlv] || .#. ConsonantPhonem _ ConsonantPhonem ,, v @-> [vdf] || {zo} _ [sh e o b] ,, [v] @-> [ww] || [ s t a] _ b ,, v @-> [ww] || [ s t aa] _ k ,, v @-> [ww] || o _ k [a | y | i | e | u | aa] ,, v @-> [vlv] || .#. ConsonantPhonem VowelPhonem _ \VoicelessConsonantPhonem ,, v @-> [vlv] || _ VSuffix .#. | AdjectiveSuffix .#. | vExceptions | VowelPhonem .#. | VowelPhonem VowelPhonem .#. | VowelPhonem VoicelessConsonantPhonem ,, v @-> [vlv] || {no} _ {in} | [ii n] ,, v @-> [vlv] || VoicelessConsonantPhonem | b | d | g | j |l | m | n | [dz] | [dsh] | [vdc] _ .#. ,, v @-> [vdf] || .#. a _ [sh a k] ,, v @-> [vdf] || .#. do _ {ted} ,, [t v] @-> [vdt vdf] || .#. o _ {ted} ,, v @-> [ww] || o _ [vdc] | [ts] ,, v @-> [vlv] || VowelPhonem _ [j | l | m | n] VowelPhonem ; 
define devoicingF v @-> [vdf] || .#. | .#. GeneralPrefix | .#. GeneralPrefix GeneralPrefix _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem ,, v @-> [vdf] || j _ [sh] ,, vlv @-> [vdf] || e _ [z tj] ; 
define devoicing b @-> [vdp] || _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, dj @-> [vdtj] || _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, dzh @-> [vdts] || _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, dz @-> [vdc] || _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, d @-> [vdt] || _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, g @-> [vdk] || _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, h @-> [vdhh] || _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, zh @-> [vdsh] || _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, z @-> [vlz] || .#. _ .#. ,, z @-> [vds] || \.#. _ VoicelessConsonantPhonem | .#. ,, v @-> [ww] || \.#. & \[vdt] _ \l & \r & \z & \VowelPhonem | .#. ; 
define devoicingV2 z @-> [vds] || _ [vdp | vdt | vdtj | vdk | vdhh] ,, zh @-> [vdsh] || _ [vdp | vdt | vdtj | vdk | vdhh] ; 
define voicingDevoicing [vdp] @-> [p] || _ ,, [vdtj] @-> [tj] || _ ,, [vdts] @-> [ts] || _ ,, [vdc] @-> [c] || _ ,, [vdt] @-> [t] || _ ,, [vdk] @-> [k] || _ ,, [vdhh] @-> [hh] || _ ,, [vds] @-> [s] || _ ,, [vdsh] @-> [sh] || _ ,, [vdf] @-> [f] || _ ,, [ww] @-> [u] || _ ,, [vlb] @-> [b] || _ ,, [vldj] @-> [dj] || _ ,, [vld] @-> [d] || _ ,, [vldz] @-> [dz] || _ ,, [vldzh] @-> [dzh] || _ ,, [vlg] @-> [g] || _ ,, [vlh] @-> [h] || _ ,, [vlzh] @-> [zh] || _ ,, [vlz] @-> [z] || _ ,, [vlv] @-> [v] || _ ; 

define Stage1 InitialTranscribe @-> ; 
define Stage2 Digraphs @-> ; 

define tgStress a0:a1|aa0:aa1|e0:e1|ee0:ee1|ije0:ije1|i0:i1|ii0:ii1|iil0:iil1|iir0:iir1|o0:o1|oo0:oo1|u0:u1|uu0:uu1|ou0:ou1|y0:y1|yy0:yy1|ax0:ax1;
define noStressV  a0 | aa0 | e0 | ee0 | ije0 | i0 | ii0 | iil0 | iir0 | o0 | oo0 | uo0 | u0 | uu0 | ou0 | y0 | yy0 | ax0 ;
define stressV  a1 | aa1 | e1 | ee1 | ije1 | i1 | ii1 | iil1 | iir1 | o1 | oo1 | uo1 | u1 | uu1 | ou1 | y1 | yy1 | ax1 ;
define vowel  noStressV  | stressV;
define pc   \vowel;
define pcx   pc - StressMark;
define noStress noStressV | pc | StressMark ; 

define vowelizeR  r -> [iir0 r]  || pc _ pcx ,,
ax0 -> iir0 || _ r ; 

define vowelizeL  l -> [iil0 l]  || pc _ pcx ,,
ax0 -> iil0 || _ l ; 

define vowelizeRr  rr -> [iir0 rr]  || pc _ pcx ,,
ax0 -> iir0 || _ rr ; 

define vowelizeLl  ll -> [iil0 ll]  || pc _ pcx ,,
ax0 -> iil0 || _ ll ; 

source stress.foma

regex Stage1 .o.
Stage2 .o.
spellSpecialCharacters .o.
odzException .o.
viachlasException .o.
deExceptions .o.
deForeignExceptions .o.
diiExceptions .o.
diExceptions .o.
diForeignExceptions .o. 
neExceptions .o.
neForeignExceptions .o.
niiExceptions .o.
niiForeignExceptions .o.
niExceptions .o.
niForeignExceptions .o.
teExceptions .o.
teForeignExceptions .o.
tiiExceptions .o.
tiPrerules .o.
tiExceptions .o.
tiExceptions2 .o.
tiForeignExceptions .o.
rules @->  .o.
exceptionsEnd .o.
vInGroup .o.
voicingExceptions .o.
devoicingExceptions .o.
devoicingF .o.
blockVoicing .o.
voicing .o.
devoicing .o.
devoicingV2 .o.
voicingDevoicing .o.
WTranscribe .o.
procStressG2p .o.
procStress2 .o.
vowelizeR .o.
vowelizeL .o.
vowelizeRr .o.
vowelizeLl ;
